California statutes. Corporations Code
(4) If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the surviving party is organized, but, except as provided in paragraph (5), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the
 foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent foreign and domestic corporation and a certificate of merger of each constituent other business entity attached, which officers’ certificates and certificates of merger shall conform to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g). If one or more domestic other business entities is a disappearing party in a merger pursuant to this subdivision in which a foreign other business entity is the surviving entity, a certificate of merger required by the laws under which that domestic other business entity is organized, including subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, or subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, as is applicable, shall also be filed at the same time as the filing of the agreement of merger.

(5) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to this subdivision is
 more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of a domestic disappearing corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation as of the date of filing in this state.

(6) In a merger described in paragraph (3) or (4), each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall by virtue of the filing pursuant to this subdivision, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business in this state. The filing of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, as is applicable, pursuant to this subdivision, by a disappearing foreign other business entity registered for the transaction of intrastate business in this state shall, by virtue of that filing, subject to subdivision (c) of
 Section 110, automatically cancels the registration for that foreign other business entity, without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 7.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11.5. Conversions [1150. - 1159.]

1150.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Converted corporation” means a corporation that results from a conversion of a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation pursuant to Section 1157.

(b) “Converted entity” means a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation that results from a conversion of a corporation under this chapter.

(c) “Converting corporation” means a corporation that converts into a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Converting entity” means a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation that converts into a corporation pursuant to Section 1157.

(e) “Domestic other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 167.7.

(f) “Foreign corporation” has the meaning provided in Section 171. 

(g) “Foreign other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 171.07.

(h) “Other business entity” has the meaning provided in Section 174.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.

(a) A corporation may be converted into a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation pursuant to this chapter if, pursuant to the proposed conversion, (1) each share of the same class or series of the converting corporation shall, unless all the shareholders of the class or series consent, be treated equally with respect to any cash, rights, securities, or other property to be received by, or any obligations or restrictions to be imposed on, the holder of that share, and (2) nonredeemable common shares of the converting corporation shall be converted only into nonredeemable equity securities of the converted entity unless all of the shareholders of the class consent; provided, however, that clause (1) shall not restrict the ability of the shareholders of a converting corporation to
 appoint one or more managers, if the converted entity is a limited liability company, or one or more general partners, if the converted entity is a limited partnership, in the plan of conversion or in the converted entity’s governing documents.

(b) Notwithstanding this section, the conversion of a corporation into a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation may be effected only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The law under which the converted entity will exist expressly permits the formation of that entity pursuant to a conversion.

(2) The corporation complies with any and all other requirements of any other law that applies to conversion to the converted entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 23.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1152.

(a) A corporation that desires to convert to a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation shall approve a plan of conversion. The plan of conversion shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the conversion.

(2) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converted entity after conversion.

(3) The manner of converting the shares of each of the shareholders of the converting corporation into securities of, or interests in, the converted entity.

(4) The provisions of the governing documents for the converted entity, including the partnership agreement if the converted entity is a partnership, the articles of organization or certificate of formation and operating agreement if the converted entity is a limited liability company, or the articles or certificate of incorporation if the converted entity is a corporation, to which the holders of interests in the converted entity are to be bound.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are required by the laws under which the converted entity is organized, or that are desired by the converting corporation.

(b) The plan of conversion shall be approved by the board of the converting corporation (Section 151), and the principal terms of the plan of the conversion shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class of the converting corporation. The approval of the outstanding shares may be given before or
 after approval by the board. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a converting corporation is a close corporation, the conversion shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of outstanding shares (Section 152) of that converting corporation; provided, however, that the articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority of the outstanding shares of each class.

(c) If the corporation is converting into a general or limited partnership or a foreign general or limited partnership or into a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company, then in addition to the approval of the shareholders set forth in subdivision (b), the
 plan of conversion shall be approved by each shareholder who will become a general partner or manager, as applicable, of the converted entity pursuant to the plan of conversion unless the shareholders have dissenters’ rights pursuant to Section 1159 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300).

(d) Upon the effectiveness of the conversion, all shareholders of the converting corporation, except those that exercise dissenters’ rights as provided in Section 1159 and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300), shall be deemed parties to any agreement or agreements constituting the governing documents for the converted entity adopted as part of the plan of conversion, irrespective of whether a shareholder has executed the plan of conversion or those governing documents for the converted entity. Any adoption of governing documents made pursuant thereto shall be effective at the effective time or date of the conversion.

(e) Notwithstanding its prior approval by the board and the outstanding shares or either of them, a plan of conversion may be amended before the conversion takes effect if the amendment is approved by the board and, if it changes any of the principal terms of the plan of conversion, by the shareholders of the converting corporation in the same manner and to the same extent as was required for approval of the original plan of conversion.

(f) A plan of conversion may be abandoned by the board of a converting corporation, or by the shareholders of a converting corporation if the abandonment is
 approved by the outstanding shares, in each case in the same manner as required for approval of the plan of conversion, subject to the contractual rights of third parties, at any time before the conversion is effective.

(g) The converted entity shall keep the plan of conversion at (1) the principal place of business of the converted entity if the converted entity is a domestic partnership, (2) the office at which records are to be kept under Section 15901.11 if the converted entity is a domestic limited partnership, (3) the office at which records are to be kept under Section 17701.13 if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company, or (4) the office at which records are to be kept under the laws of the jurisdiction applicable to the converted entity if the converted entity is a foreign other business entity or foreign corporation. Upon the request of a shareholder of a converting corporation, the authorized person on behalf of the converted entity shall promptly deliver to the shareholder, at the expense of the converted entity, a copy of the plan of conversion. A waiver by a shareholder of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 3.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1153.

(a) After the approval, as provided in Section 1152, of a plan of conversion by the board and the outstanding shares of a corporation, the converting corporation shall cause the filing of all documents required by law, including, in the case of a corporation converting into a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, the laws of the state or place of organization of the foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, to effect the conversion and create the converted entity, which documents shall include a certificate of conversion or a statement of conversion as required by Section 1155, and the conversion shall thereupon be effective, or, in the case of a corporation converting into a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, shall be effective in accordance with the laws of the state or place of organization of the foreign corporation or foreign other business entity.

(b) A copy of the statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, or articles of organization, or certificate of conversion complying with Section 1155, duly certified by the Secretary of State on or after the effective date, is conclusive evidence of the conversion of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 4.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

(a) To enforce an obligation of a corporation that has converted to a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, the Secretary of State shall only be the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against that converted foreign entity, if the agent designated for the service of process for that entity is a natural person and cannot be found with due diligence or if the agent is a corporation and no person, to whom delivery may be made, may be located with due diligence, or if no agent has been designated and if none of the officers, members, managers, or agents of that entity may be located after diligent search, and it is shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court. The court then may make an order that service be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State or to an
 assistant or Deputy Secretary of State of two copies of the process together with two copies of the order, and the order shall set forth an address to which the process shall be sent by the Secretary of State. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State. 

(b) Upon receipt of the process and order and the fee set forth in Section 12197 of the Government Code, the Secretary of State shall provide notice to that entity of the service of the process by forwarding by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the process and order to the address specified in the order. 

(c) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State and shall record the time of service and the Secretary of State’s action with respect to the process served. The certificate of the Secretary of
 State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the providing of notice of process to that entity, and the forwarding of the process shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 5.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

(a) To convert a corporation:

(1) If the corporation is converting into a domestic limited partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the certificate of limited partnership for the converted entity.

(2) If the corporation is converting into a domestic partnership, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the statement of partnership authority for the converted entity, or if no statement of partnership authority is filed then a certificate of conversion shall be filed separately.

(3) If the corporation is converting into a domestic limited liability company, a statement of conversion shall be completed on the
 articles of organization for the converted entity.

(4) If the corporation is converting into a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation, a certificate of conversion shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) Any statement or certificate of conversion of a converting corporation shall be executed and acknowledged by those officers of the converting corporation as would be required to sign an officers’ certificate (Section 173), and shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the converting corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the converting corporation.

(2) A statement of the total number of
 outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the conversion, that the principal terms of the plan of conversion were approved by a vote of the number of shares of each class which equaled or exceeded the vote required under Section 1152, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(3) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converted entity.

(4) The name, mailing address, and street address of the converted entity’s agent for service of process. If a corporation qualified under Section 1505 is designated as the agent, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, the certificate of conversion shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(d) The
 filing with the Secretary of State of a statement of conversion on an organizational document or a certificate of conversion as set forth in subdivision (a) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of dissolution by the converting corporation and no converting corporation that has made the filing is required to file a certificate of election under Section 1901 or a certificate of dissolution under Section 1905 as a result of that conversion.

(e) Upon the effectiveness of a conversion pursuant to this chapter, a converted entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of the converting corporation (1) to prepare and file or cause to be prepared and filed all tax and information returns otherwise required of the converting corporation under the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and (2) to pay any tax liability determined to be due pursuant to that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 6.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.

(a) Whenever a corporation or other business entity having any real property in this state converts into a corporation or an other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which the corporation or other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization, including this state, of the converting corporation or other converting entity provide substantially that the conversion vests in the converted corporation or other converted entity all the real property of the converting
 corporation or other converting entity, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the converting corporation or other converting entity is located of either (1) a certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership or articles of organization containing a statement of conversion complying with Section 1155 and certified on or after the effective date of the conversion by the Secretary of State or (2) a copy of a certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or other comparable organizing document evidencing the creation of a foreign other business entity or foreign corporation, containing a statement of conversion, meeting the requirements of subdivision (b) and certified on or after the effective date of the conversion by the Secretary of State or any other authorized
 public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the converted entity is organized, shall evidence record ownership in the converted corporation or other converted entity of all interest of the converting corporation or other converting entity in and to the real property located in that county.

(b) A filed and, if appropriate, recorded certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or other comparable organizing document evidencing the formation of a foreign other business entity or a foreign corporation referred to in clause (2) of subdivision (a) above which contains a statement of conversion, stating the name of the converting corporation or other converting entity in whose name property was held before the conversion and the name of the converted entity or converted corporation, but not containing all of the other
 information required by Section 1155, operates with respect to the converted entity named to the extent provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Recording of a certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of incorporation, or other comparable organizing document evidencing the creation of an other business entity or a corporation, containing a statement of conversion, in accordance with subdivision (a), shall create, in favor of bona fide purchasers or encumbrances for value, a conclusive presumption that the conversion was validly completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1157.

(a) A domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation may be converted into a corporation pursuant to this chapter only if the converting entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the conversion.

(b) A domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation that desires to convert into a corporation shall approve a plan of conversion or other instrument as is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under which that entity is organized.

(c) The conversion of a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation shall be approved by the number or percentage of the partners, members, shareholders, or other holders of interest of the converting entity that is required by the laws under which that entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage as may be set forth in the converting entity’s partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating agreement, articles of incorporation, or other governing document in accordance with applicable laws.

(d) The conversion by a domestic other business entity, foreign other business entity, or foreign corporation shall be effective under this chapter upon the filing with the Secretary of State of the articles of incorporation of the converted corporation, containing a statement of conversion that complies with subdivision (e).

(e) A statement of conversion of an entity converting into a corporation pursuant to this chapter shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name, form, and jurisdiction of organization of the converting entity.

(2) The Secretary of State’s file number, if any, of the converting entity.

(3) If the converting entity is a foreign other
 business entity or a foreign corporation, the statement of conversion shall contain the following:

(A) A statement that the converting entity is authorized to effect the conversion by the laws under which it is organized.

(B) A statement that the converting entity has approved a plan of conversion or other instrument as is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under which the converting entity is organized.

(C) A statement that the conversion has been approved by the number or percentage of the partners, members, shareholders, or other holders of interest of the converting entity that is required by the laws under which that entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage as may be set forth in the converting entity’s partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating
 agreement, articles of incorporation, or other governing document in accordance with applicable laws.

(f) The filing with the Secretary of State of articles of incorporation containing a statement pursuant to subdivision (e) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation by a converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited partnership, and no converting foreign limited liability company or foreign limited partnership that has made the filing is required to file a certificate of cancellation under Section 15909.07 or 17708.06 as a result of that conversion. If a converting entity is a foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this state, the foreign corporation shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 237, Sec. 7.   (SB 49)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1158.

(a) An entity that converts into another entity pursuant to this chapter is for all purposes other than for the purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, Part 10.20 (commencing with Section 18401) of, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the same entity that existed before the conversion.

(b) Upon a conversion taking effect, all of the following apply:

(1) All the rights and property, whether real, personal, or mixed, of the converting entity or converting corporation are vested in the converted entity or converted corporation.

(2) All debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converting entity or converting corporation continue as debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converted entity or converted corporation.

(3) All rights of creditors and liens upon the property of the converting entity or converting corporation shall be preserved unimpaired and remain enforceable against the converted entity or converted corporation to the same extent as against the converting entity or converting corporation as if the conversion had not occurred.

(4) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the converting entity or converting corporation may be
 continued against the converted entity or converted corporation as if the conversion had not occurred.

(c) A shareholder of a converting corporation is liable for:

(1) All obligations of the converting corporation for which the shareholder was personally liable before the conversion, but only to the extent that the shareholder was personally liable for the obligations of the converting corporation before the conversion.

(2) All obligations of the converted entity incurred after the conversion takes effect if (A) the shareholder becomes a general partner of a converted entity that is a general or limited partnership and, as a general partner, has liability under the laws under which the converted entity is organized or under the converted entity’s governing documents or (B) the shareholder becomes a holder of other
 interests in the converted entity and, as a holder, has liability under the laws under which the converted entity is organized or under the converted entity’s governing documents.

(d) A shareholder of a converted corporation remains liable for any and all obligations of the converting entity for which the shareholder was personally liable before the conversion, but only to the extent that the shareholder was personally liable for the obligations of the converting entity prior to the conversion.

(e) If a party to a transaction with a converted corporation that converted from a partnership reasonably believes when entering into the transaction that a shareholder of the converted corporation continues to be a general partner of the converting entity after the conversion is effective, and the shareholder was a general partner of the partnership that converted into the converted
 corporation, the shareholder is liable for an obligation incurred by the converted corporation within 90 days after the conversion takes effect. The shareholder’s liability for all other obligations of the converted corporation incurred after the conversion takes effect is that of a shareholder of a corporation.

(f) The converted entity shall cause written notice of the conversion to be given by mail within 90 days after the effective date of the conversion to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the converting entity. Failure to comply with this subdivision shall not affect the validity of the conversion, extend the 90-day period set forth in subdivision (e), or otherwise affect the rights of a creditor or claimant under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1159.

The shareholders of a converting corporation shall have all of the rights under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of the shareholders of a corporation involved in a reorganization requiring the approval of its outstanding shares (Section 152), and the converting corporation shall have all of the obligations under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of a corporation involved in the reorganization. Solely for purposes of applying the provisions of Chapter 13 (and not for purposes of Chapter 12), a conversion pursuant to Section 1151 or 1157 shall be
 deemed to constitute a reorganization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Reorganizations [1200. - 1203.]

1200.

A reorganization (Section 181) or a share exchange tender offer (Section 183.5) shall be approved by the board of:

(a) Each constituent corporation in a merger reorganization;

(b) The acquiring corporation in an exchange reorganization;

(c) The acquiring corporation and the corporation whose property and assets are acquired in a sale-of-assets reorganization;

(d) The acquiring corporation in a share exchange tender offer (Section 183.5); and

(e) The corporation in control of any constituent or acquiring domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity under subdivision (a), (b) or (c) and whose equity securities are issued, transferred, or exchanged in the reorganization (a “parent party”).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

(a) The principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class of each corporation the approval of whose board is required under Section 1200, except as provided in subdivision (b) and except that (unless otherwise provided in the articles) no approval of any class of outstanding preferred shares of the surviving or acquiring corporation or parent party shall be required if the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon that class of shares remain unchanged (subject to the provisions of subdivision (c)). For the purpose of this subdivision, two classes of common shares differing only as to voting rights shall be considered as a single class of shares.

(b) No approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) is required by subdivision (a) in the case of any corporation if that corporation, or its shareholders immediately before the reorganization, or both, shall own (immediately after the reorganization) equity securities, other than any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase those equity securities, of the surviving or acquiring corporation or a parent party (subdivision (e) of Section 1200) possessing more than five-sixths of the voting power of the surviving or acquiring corporation or parent party. In making the determination of ownership by the shareholders of a corporation, immediately after the reorganization, of equity securities pursuant to the preceding sentence, equity securities which they owned immediately before the reorganization as shareholders of another party to the
 transaction shall be disregarded. For the purpose of this section only, the voting power of a corporation shall be calculated by assuming the conversion of all equity securities convertible (immediately or at some future time) into shares entitled to vote but not assuming the exercise of any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase those shares.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of the surviving corporation in a merger reorganization if any amendment is made to its articles that would otherwise require that approval.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of any class of a
 corporation that is a party to a merger or sale-of-assets reorganization if holders of shares of that class
 receive shares of the surviving or acquiring corporation or parent party having different rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions than those surrendered. Shares in a foreign corporation received in exchange for shares in a domestic corporation have different rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions within the meaning of the preceding sentence.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of the outstanding shares (Section 152) of any close corporation if the reorganization would result in their receiving shares of a corporation that is not a close corporation. However, the articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority
 of the outstanding shares of each class.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of the outstanding shares (Section 152) of a corporation that is a party to a merger reorganization if holders of shares receive shares of a surviving social purpose corporation in the merger.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of any class of a corporation that is a party to a merger reorganization if holders of shares of that class receive interests of a surviving other business entity in the merger.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the principal terms of a reorganization shall be approved by all shareholders of any class or series if, as a result of the reorganization, the holders of that class or series become personally liable for any obligations of a party to the reorganization, unless all holders of that class or series have the dissenters’ rights provided in Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300).

(i) Any approval required by this section may be given before or after the approval by the board. Notwithstanding approval required by this section, the board may abandon the proposed reorganization without further action by the shareholders, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 22.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.5.

(a) The principal terms of a share exchange tender offer (Section 183. 5) shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of each class of the corporation making the tender offer or whose shares are to be used in the tender offer, except as provided in subdivision (b) and except that (unless otherwise provided in the articles) no approval of any class of outstanding preferred shares of either corporation shall be required, if the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon that class of shares remain unchanged. For the purpose of this subdivision, two classes of common shares differing only
 as to voting rights shall be considered as a single class of shares.

(b) No approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) is required by subdivision (a) in the case of any corporation if the corporation, or its shareholders immediately before the tender offer, or both, shall own (immediately after the completion of the share exchange proposed in the tender offer) equity securities, (other than any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase the equity securities), of the corporation making the tender offer or of the corporation whose shares were used in the tender offer, possessing more than five-sixths of the voting power of either corporation. In making the determination of ownership by the shareholders of a corporation, immediately after the tender offer, of equity securities pursuant to the preceding sentence, equity securities which they owned immediately before the tender offer as shareholders of another party to the transaction shall
 be disregarded. For the purpose of this section only, the voting power of a corporation shall be calculated by assuming the conversion of all equity securities convertible (immediately or at some future time) into shares entitled to vote but not assuming the exercise of any warrant or right to subscribe to, or purchase, shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 1201, the principal terms of a merger reorganization shall be approved by all the outstanding shares of a corporation if the agreement of merger provides that all the outstanding shares of that corporation are canceled without consideration in the merger.

(b) In addition to the requirements of Section 1201, if the terms of a merger reorganization or sale-of-assets reorganization provide that a class or series of preferred shares is to have distributed to it a lesser amount than would be required by applicable article
 provisions, the principal terms of the reorganization shall be approved by the same percentage of outstanding shares of that class or series which would be required to approve an amendment of the article provisions to provide for the distribution of that lesser amount.

(c) If a parent party within the meaning of Section 1200 is a foreign corporation (other than a foreign corporation to which subdivision (a) of Section 2115 is applicable), any requirement or lack of a requirement for approval by the outstanding shares of the foreign corporation shall be based, not on the application of Sections 1200 and 1201, but on the application of the laws of the state or place of incorporation of the foreign corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

(a) If a tender offer, including a share exchange tender offer (Section 183.5), or a written proposal for approval of a reorganization subject to Section 1200 or for a sale of assets subject to subdivision (a) of Section 1001 is made to some or all of a corporation’s shareholders by an interested party (herein referred to as an “Interested Party Proposal”), an affirmative opinion in writing as to the fairness of the consideration to the shareholders of that corporation shall be delivered as follows:

(1) If no shareholder approval or acceptance is required for the
 consummation of the transaction, the opinion shall be delivered to the corporation’s board of directors not later than the time that consummation of the transaction is authorized and approved by the board of directors.

(2) If a tender offer is made to the corporation’s shareholders, the opinion shall be delivered to the shareholders at the time that the tender offer is first made in writing to the shareholders. However, if the tender offer is commenced by publication and tender offer materials are subsequently mailed or otherwise distributed to the shareholders, the opinion may be omitted in that publication if the opinion is included in the materials distributed to the shareholders.

(3) If a shareholders’ meeting is to be held to vote on approval of the transaction, the opinion shall be delivered to the shareholders with the notice of the meeting (Section 601).

(4) If consents of all shareholders entitled to vote are solicited in writing (Section 603), the opinion shall be delivered at the same time as that solicitation.
